Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-103
University of Nebraska; government; Board of Regents; election; vacancies.

The general government of the University of Nebraska shall be vested in a board of eight regents elected from districts as provided in section 32-510. Vacancies occurring in the board shall be filled as provided in section 32-573.

Laws 1869, § 3, p. 172;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 56;

R.S.1913, § 7083;

C.S.1922, § 6715;

C.S.1929, § 85-103;

R.S.1943, § 85-103;

Laws 1947, c. 351, § 2, p. 1102;

Laws 1961, c. 457, § 1, p. 1396;

Laws 1969, c. 847, § 2, p. 3188;

Laws 1971, LB 1035, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 617, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 611;

Laws 2003, LB 181, § 6.

Election provisions, see the Election Act, section 32-101.

Official bonds and oaths, see Chapter 11.

Board of Regents can exercise only such powers as are expressly given to it, or which may be necessary to carry into effect those powers specially given. Regents of the University of Nebraska v. McConnell, 5 Neb. 423 (1877).